New York, session 2025-2026, S5039.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 45 of section 33-0101 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as added by chapter 685 of the laws of 1978 and as 3 renumbered by chapter 612 of the laws of 1983, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 45. "Weed" means any plant [which grows where not wanted] species 6 designated as noxious, harmful, exotic, invasive, injurious or poisonous 7 pursuant to state or federal law, and shall not include any endangered 8 species or any plants indigenous to this state. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09699-01-5